Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3756.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COUNCIL ON DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES.new text end new text begin $50,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $50,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for the Minnesota Governor's Council on Developmental Disabilities to continue to preserve and raise awareness of the history of Minnesotans with developmental disabilities. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end